Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2521.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4804 of Title 3 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4804. Purpose.The department shall operate the center for the following purposes:* * *(9) To devise, award and administer grants to agricultural operations impacted by acute market disruptions.Section 2. Section 4807(b) of Title 3 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4807. Limitation on grants.* * *(b) Matching.--[Grant] Except as provided under subsection 123456789101112131415161718 (d), grant amounts shall be limited to 75% of project costs. In-kind support shall not be counted toward an applicant's matching contribution.* * *(d) Acute market disruptions.--The limitation of grants to 75% or less of project costs under subsection (b) shall not apply during any period for which the secretary has determined that an acute disruption has occurred within the agricultural market.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2521PN3409 - 2 - 12345678910